North Carolina statutes. Chapter 128. Offices and Public Officers.
Article 3. Retirement System for Counties, Cities and Towns.
1939, c. 390, s. 10; 1941, c. 357, s. 8; 1943, c. 535; 1945, c. 526, s. 6; 1951, c. 274, ss. 7-9; 1955, c. 1153, s. 7; 1959, c. 491, s. 9; 1965, c. 781; 1967, c. 978, ss. 9, 10; 1971, c. 325, ss. 17-19; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, ss. 129, 130; 1981, c. 1000, ss. 1, 3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 9; 1985, c. 479, s. 196(p)-(r); c. 539, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 585, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 68; 2003-359, s. 20; 2009-66, s. 7(b); 2010-72, s. 8(b); 2012-178, s. 3; 2014-88, s. 1(f); 2014-112, s. 2(b); 2015-164, ss. 5(b), 6(b); 2015-168, s. 3(b); 2016-56, ss. 6(b), 7(b); 2017-125, s. 2(b); 2017-128, ss. 4(c), 8(b); 2017-129, s. 2(c), (d), (g), (i), (k); 2018-52, s. 9(b); 2018-85, s. 13; 2020-29, s. 4(b); 2020-48, ss. 1.8(b), 1.16(e), (f); 2021-72, ss. 1.1(a), 3.1(c); 2021-75, ss. 1.3(a), 2.1(a).

Subsection (g) Set Out Twice.

The first version of subsection (g) set out above is effective until July 1, 2022. The second version of subsection (g) set out above is effective July 1, 2022.